Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5204SV (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 2294 Section 1. Section 474.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. As used in this chapter and chapters 475A , 476 , 476A , 3 477A, 477B, 477C , 478 , 479 , 479A , and 479B , âcommissionâ and 4 âutilities commissionâ mean the Iowa utilities commission. 5 Sec. 2. Section 476.95, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. Any authority of the commission over 8 the audio volume of commercials provided by video streaming 9 services pursuant to chapter 477B. 10 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 477B.1 Video streaming services ââ 11 audio volume of commercials. 12 1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context 13 otherwise requires: 14 a. âConsumer-generated mediaâ means content, including 15 video, audio, and multimedia, created and made available by 16 consumers to internet sites or services on the internet. 17 b. âMultichannel video programming distributorâ does not 18 include an entity that distributes video programming or video 19 content using internet protocol. 20 c. âVideo programmingâ means programming by, or generally 21 considered comparable to programming provided by, a television 22 broadcast station. âVideo programmingâ does not include 23 consumer-generated media. 24 d. (1) âVideo streaming serviceâ means an entity that makes 25 available directly to the consumer, through a distribution 26 method that uses internet protocol, any of the following: 27 (a) Video programming. 28 (b) Video content. 29 (2) âVideo streaming serviceâ does not include a television 30 broadcast station, cable operator, or other multichannel video 31 programming distributor, or an entity that provides video 32 programming or video content without commercial advertisements. 33 2. Advertisement volume. On and after July 1, 2026, a video 34 streaming service shall not transmit to a consumer within this 35 -1- LSB 5204SV (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 4 S.F. 2294 state a commercial advertisement at an audio volume louder than 1 the audio volume of the video programming or video content the 2 advertisement accompanies. 3 3. Enforcement ââ penalties. 4 a. If the commission has reasonable belief that a video 5 streaming service is in violation of subsection 2, the 6 commission shall have the sole authority to enforce this 7 chapter, including all of the following: 8 (1) Enjoin further violations by the video streaming 9 service. 10 (2) Enforce compliance with this chapter. 11 (3) Seek civil penalties in an amount of not more than 12 five hundred dollars for each violation of this section. For 13 purposes of this subsection, each day a violation of subsection 14 2 occurs shall be a separate violation. 15 b. If the commission notifies a video streaming service of 16 complaints in violation of this section, the video streaming 17 service may demonstrate compliance by doing any of the 18 following: 19 (1) Providing evidence of actual compliance with this 20 section. 21 (2) Providing evidence of ongoing compliance with the 22 standards adopted by the commission. 23 4. Private right of action. This section shall not be 24 construed to create a private right of action. 25 5. Commission powers and duties. 26 a. Video streaming services subject to this chapter are 27 subject to complaints and investigations by the commission. 28 b. Video streaming services shall be subject to such rules 29 as the commission may prescribe in order to carry out its 30 authority under this chapter. 31 c. In order to carry out the duties imposed by this section, 32 the commission may, at its discretion, allocate and charge 33 directly the expenses attributable to its duties to the persons 34 or entities subject to proceedings carried out in accordance 35 -2- LSB 5204SV (2) 91 sb/js 2/ 4 S.F. 2294 with this section. 1